test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiishinaanibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiishinaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiishinaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiishinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiishiwaabaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiishiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiishiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiishiniibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiishiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiishiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiishiniidig, omiskweyaabiishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiishiniidig, omiskweyaabiishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiishiniidig, omiskweyaabiishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiishiwaabaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiishiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiishiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiishiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimiskweyaabiinyimishinaaniban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimiskweyaabiinsimishinaaniban
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gimiskweyaabiinyimishinaaniban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimiskweyaabiinyimishiwaaban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaaniban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaaban
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omiskweyaabiinyimishiniiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaaban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omiskweyaabiinsimishiniiban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaaban
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinyimishinaaning
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinsimishinaaning
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinyimishinaaning
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyimishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinyimishiwaang
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyimishiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyimishiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaaning
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaang
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaan
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyimishiniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyimishiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyimishiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaang
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsimishiniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsimishiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsimishiniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaang
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaan
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinyimishibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinsimishibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinyimishibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsimishibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyimishibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsimishibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: imiskweyaabiinyimishibaniing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: imiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: imiskweyaabiinyimishibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: imiskweyaabiinsimishibaniing
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: imiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     X+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: imiskweyaabiinsimishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanibaniing
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanibaniin
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidog]
     1+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidig, nimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinyiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaabaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinyimiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanibaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanibaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinsiminaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaabaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinsimiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyiminiibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyiminiibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyiminiibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiinyiminiidig, omiskweyaabiinyiminiidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiinyiminiidig, omiskweyaabiinyiminiidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiinyiminiidig, omiskweyaabiinyiminiidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyimiwaabaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyimiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyimiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiinyimiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinyimiwaadog]
